Tennessee, session 114, SB0356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-30-313(c), is amended by deleting
"report to the commissioner" and substituting "electronically report to the commissioner".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0356
001931
- 1 -